California, session 20252026, AB286.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 739.15 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:739.15. (a) The commission shall reduce generate a report outlining recommendations to decrease the kilowatt-per-hour rate for electricity charged to ratepayers by not less than 30 percent. percent by January 1, 2027.(b) In making the reduction recommendations pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall do all of the following:(1) Review each public purpose program that is not cost effective, and evaluate each public purpose program that the commission has not yet evaluated for cost-effectiveness.(2) For purposes of the climate credit described in Section 748.5, consider adopting the suggestions made by the commission in its CPUC Response to Executive Order No. N-5-24 (February 18, 2025).(3) Pursuant to the commission’s authority under Section 314.6, audit costs claimed by an electrical corporation for implementing its wildfire mitigation plans and, to the extent those costs are unreasonable, reduce recommend reducing rates accordingly.(4) Evaluate each program listed in Table A-2 of the commission’s CPUC Response to Executive Order No. N-5-24 (February 18, 2025) for cost-effectiveness, if the commission has not yet evaluated the program for cost-effectiveness. For a program that the commission determines is not cost effective, eliminate, reform, or recommend action by the Legislature.